Massachusetts, session 194th, H3553.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Section 11F of Chapter 25A is hereby amended by sticking paragraph (d) in its
eternity and inserting in its place the following:
(d) Every retail electric supplier providing service under contracts executed or extended
on or after January 1, 2009, shall provide a minimum percentage of kilowatt-hour sales to end-
use customers in the commonwealth from Class II renewable energy generating sources. For the
purposes of this section, a Class II renewable energy generating source is one that began
commercial operation before December 31, 1997 and generates electricity using any of the
following: (1) solar photovoltaic or solar thermal electric energy; (2) wind energy; (3) ocean
thermal, wave or tidal energy; (4) fuel cells utilizing renewable fuels; (5) landfill gas; (6) energy
generated by existing hydroelectric facilities, provided that such existing facility shall meet
appropriate and site-specific standards that address adequate and healthy river flows, water
quality standards, fish passage and protection measures and mitigation and enhancement
of 2

opportunities in the impacted watershed as determined by the department in consultation with
relevant state and federal agencies having oversight and jurisdiction over hydropower facilities;
and provided further, that only energy from existing facilities up to 7.5 megawatts shall be
considered renewable energy and no such facility shall involve pumped storage of water nor
construction of any new dam or water diversion structure constructed later than January 1, 1998;
(7) low emission advanced power conversion technologies using fuels such as by-products or
waste from agricultural crops, food or animals, energy crops, biogas, liquid biofuel including but
not limited to biodiesel, organic refuse-derived fuel, or algae; (8) marine or hydrokinetic energy
as defined in section 3; or (9) geothermal energy. A facility shall not be a Class II renewable
generating source unless it operates or contracts for one or more recycling programs approved by
the department of environmental protection. At least 34.75 per cent of any revenue received by
the facility through the sale of Massachusetts RPS–eligible renewable energy certificates shall be
allocated to such recycling programs. A Class II renewable generating source may be located
behind the customer meter within the ISO–NE control area provided that the output is verified by
an independent verification system participating in the NEPOOL GIS accounting system and
approved by the department.
of 2